Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5305.01
Certain new water systems; technical, managerial, and financial capacity.

All new community water systems and new nontransient noncommunity water systems commencing operation after October 1, 1999, shall demonstrate technical, managerial, and financial capacity to operate under the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to determine demonstration requirements for technical, managerial, and financial capacity of community water systems and nontransient noncommunity water systems.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 613.